Florida, session 2026, SB1754.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âParagraph (h) is added to subsection (5) of 23 section 394.47893, Florida Statutes, as created by SB ____, 2026 24 Regular Session, to read: 25 394.47893âDrug overdose review; Drug Overdose Death Review 26 Committee; local review committees.â 27 (5)âACCESS TO AND USE OF RECORDS AND INFORMATION.â 28 (h)1.âAny record or information held by the Drug Overdose 29 Death Review Committee or a local review committee which reveals 30 the identity of a decedent whose death occurred as a result of 31 drug overdose, or which reveals the identity of the family 32 member of such decedent, is confidential and exempt from s. 33 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. The 34 Drug Overdose Death Review Committee or a local review committee 35 may share records and information made confidential and exempt 36 by this section with all of the following: 37 a.âEach other. 38 b.âA governmental agency in furtherance of its duties. 39 c.âAny person or entity authorized by the Department of 40 Health to use such relevant records or information for bona fide 41 research or statistical purposes. A person or an entity that is 42 authorized to use such relevant records or information for 43 research or statistical purposes must enter into a privacy and 44 security agreement with the Department of Health and comply with 45 all laws and rules governing the usage of such records and 46 information for research or statistical purposes. Anything 47 identifying the subjects of such relevant records or information 48 must be treated as confidential by the person or entity and may 49 not be released in any form. 50 2.âPortions of meetings held by the Drug Overdose Death 51 Review Committee or a local review committee at which any record 52 or information made confidential and exempt under subparagraph 53 1. is discussed are exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I 54 of the State Constitution. The closed portion of a meeting must 55 be recorded, and no portion of the closed meeting may be off the 56 record. The recording must be maintained by the Drug Overdose 57 Death Review Committee or by a local review committee, as 58 applicable. 59 3.âA person who knowingly or willfully makes public or 60 discloses to any unauthorized person any record or information 61 held by the Drug Overdose Death Review Committee or a local 62 review committee which is confidential and exempt under this 63 paragraph commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable 64 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 65 4.âThis paragraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset 66 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 67 on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 68 through reenactment by the Legislature. 69 Section 2.âParagraph (h) is added to subsection (5) of 70 section 394.47894, Florida Statutes, as created by SB ____, 2026 71 Regular Session, to read: 72 394.47894âSuicide review; Suicide Death Review Committee; 73 local review committees.â 74 (5)âACCESS TO AND USE OF RECORDS AND INFORMATION.â 75 (h)1.âAny record or information held by the Suicide Death 76 Review Committee or a local review committee which reveals the 77 identity of a decedent whose death occurred as a result of 78 suicide, or which reveals the identity of a family member of 79 such decedent, is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 80 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. The Suicide Death 81 Review Committee or a local review committee may share records 82 and information made confidential and exempt by this section 83 with all of the following: 84 a.âEach other. 85 b.âA governmental agency in furtherance of its duties. 86 c.âAny person or entity authorized by the Department of 87 Health to use such relevant records or information for bona fide 88 research or statistical purposes. A person or an entity that is 89 authorized to use such relevant records or information for 90 research or statistical purposes must enter into a privacy and 91 security agreement with the Department of Health and comply with 92 all laws and rules governing the usage of such records and 93 information for research or statistical purposes. Anything 94 identifying the subjects of such relevant records or information 95 must be treated as confidential by the person or entity and may 96 not be released in any form. 97 2.âPortions of meetings held by the Suicide Death Review 98 Committee or a local review committee at which any record or 99 information made confidential and exempt under subparagraph 1. 100 is discussed are exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of 101 the State Constitution. The closed portion of a meeting must be 102 recorded, and no portion of the closed meeting may be off the 103 record. The recording must be maintained by the Suicide Death 104 Review Committee or by a local review committee, as applicable. 105 3.âA person who knowingly or willfully makes public or 106 discloses to any unauthorized person any record or information 107 held by the Suicide Death Review Committee or a local review 108 committee which is confidential and exempt under this paragraph 109 commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as 110 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 111 4.âThis paragraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset 112 Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed 113 on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal 114 through reenactment by the Legislature. 115 Section 3.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 116 necessity that any record or information held by the Drug 117 Overdose Death Review Committee or the Suicide Death Review 118 Committee or a local review committee established thereunder 119 which reveals the identity of a decedent whose death occurred as 120 a result of a drug overdose or suicide, as applicable, or which 121 reveals the identity of a family member of such decedent, be 122 made confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida 123 Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. The 124 Legislature finds that such records and information revealing 125 the identity of a decedent whose death occurred as a result of a 126 drug overdose or suicide, or which reveal the identity of a 127 family member of such decedent, are of a sensitive personal 128 nature. The Legislature finds that the release of such records 129 or information could cause unwarranted damage to the good name 130 or reputation of such decedents and their family members, could 131 jeopardize the safety of the family members of such decedents, 132 and could cause unnecessary trauma, sorrow, humiliation, and 133 emotional injury to the family members of such decedents. The 134 Legislature makes these findings considering the existence of 135 the Internet and the proliferation of websites throughout the 136 world which encourage the incessant dissemination of 137 information. The Legislature finds that protecting the 138 confidentiality of this sensitive information ensures the 139 effectiveness of the review process of drug overdose deaths and 140 suicides, especially as it concerns the sharing of records and 141 information between the local review committees and the Drug 142 Overdose Death Review Committee and the Suicide Death Review 143 Committee, as applicable. 144 (2)âThe Legislature finds it to be a public necessity that 145 portions of meetings held by the Drug Overdose Death Review 146 Committee or the Suicide Death Review Committee or a local 147 review committee established thereunder at which records or 148 information made confidential and exempt under s. 149 394.47893(5)(h)1., Florida Statutes, or s. 394.47894(5)(h)1., 150 Florida Statutes, as applicable, is discussed be made exempt 151 from s. 286.011, Florida Statutes, and s. 24(b), Article I of 152 the State Constitution. The Legislature finds that without such 153 an exemption, the open deliberation and discussion of drug 154 overdose deaths and suicides amongst the parties involved in the 155 reviews of such deaths would be impeded. 156 (3)âThe Legislature further finds that the increased 157 potential for a reduction in drug overdose deaths and suicides 158 as a result of these exemptions substantially outweighs any 159 minimal public benefit derived from the release of such records 160 and information made confidential and exempt. 161 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 162 SB ____ or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 163 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 164 thereof and becomes a law.